Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1413
Disciplinary actions; procedure.

(1) Before the board denies any license or any registration as described in section 60-1417.02, revokes or suspends any such license or registration, places a licensee or registrant on probation, or assesses an administrative fine under section 60-1411.02, the board, or hearing officer employed by the board, shall give the applicant, licensee, registrant, or violator a hearing on the matter unless the hearing is waived upon agreement between the applicant, licensee, registrant, or violator and the executive director, with the approval of the board. As a condition of the waiver, the applicant, licensee, registrant, or violator shall accept the fine or other administrative action. If the hearing is not waived, the board shall, at least thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing, notify the party in writing. Such notice in writing shall contain an exact statement of the charges against the party and the date and place of hearing. The party shall have full authority to be heard in person or by counsel before the board, or hearing officer employed by the board, in reference to the charges. The written notice may be served by delivery personally to the party or by mailing the notice by registered or certified mail to the last-known business address of the party. If the applicant is a dealer's agent, the board shall also notify the dealer employing or contracting with him or her or whose employ he or she seeks to enter by mailing the notice to the dealer's last-known business address. A stenographic record of all testimony presented at the hearings shall be made and preserved pending final disposition of the complaint.

(2) When the licensee fails to maintain a bond as provided in section 60-1419, an established place of business, or liability insurance as prescribed by subsection (3) of section 60-1407.01, the license shall immediately expire. The executive director shall notify the licensee personally or by mailing the notice by registered or certified mail to the last-known address of the licensee that his or her license is revoked until a bond as required by section 60-1419 or liability insurance as prescribed by subsection (3) of section 60-1407.01 is furnished and approved in which event the license may be reinstated.

(3) Upon notice of the revocation or suspension of the license, the licensee shall immediately surrender the expired license to the executive director or his or her representative. If the license is suspended, the executive director or his or her representative shall return the license to the licensee at the time of the conclusion of the period of suspension. Failure to surrender the license as required in this section shall subject the licensee to the penalties provided in section 60-1416.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 13, p. 1022;

Laws 1963, c. 365, § 10, p. 1177;

Laws 1967, c. 394, § 8, p. 1235;

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 15;

Laws 1978, LB 248, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 825, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 106, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 564, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 632, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB346, § 10;

Laws 2022, LB1148, § 2.